Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 14

Terminal Companies

65-14-101. Special powers.

In addition to the general powers, railroad terminal corporations have the power to acquire, in this or any other state or states, and at such place or places as shall be found expedient, such real estate as may be necessary on which to construct, operate, and maintain passenger stations, comprising passenger depots, office buildings, sheds, and storage yards; and freight stations, comprising freight depots, warehouses, offices, and freight yards, roundhouses, and machine shops; also main and side tracks, switches, crossovers, turnouts, and other terminal railroad facilities, appurtenances, and accommodations suitable, in size, location, and manner of construction, to perform promptly and efficiently the work of receiving, delivering, and transferring all passengers and freight traffic of railroad companies with which it may enter into contracts for the use of its terminal facilities at such place or places. Such corporation has the power, by purchase, lease, or assignment of lease, to acquire and hold, and to lease to others, such real estate as may be necessary for the above mentioned purpose of its incorporation; and it may also acquire such real estate by condemnation, in pursuance of the general law authorizing the condemnation of private property for works of internal improvement.

Acts 1893, ch. 11, § 3; Shan., § 2430; mod. Code 1932, § 4060; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1401.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 17.

65-14-102. Right to construct facilities across or along streets and alleys.

When it may be necessary, in order to enable the corporation to acquire and construct proper railroad terminal facilities in any town or city, or to connect such facilities with the tracks of any railroad company with whom the corporation may have contracted to furnish such facilities, the corporation, with the consent of the proper authorities of such town or city, shall have the right to lay and operate a track or tracks across or along or over or under such of the streets or alleys of such town or city as may be necessary for that purpose; and the corporation may also, with such consent, construct such passenger or freight depots or stations across or along, over or under, any such street or alley when it shall be necessary in order to furnish proper railroad terminal facilities in the town or city. But no street or alley of any town or city shall be obstructed or interfered with until the consent of the proper authorities of the town or city shall have been first obtained.

Acts 1893, ch. 11, § 3; Shan., § 2431; mod. Code 1932, § 4061; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1402.

65-14-103. Authority to acquire, hold and dispose of stock or bonds.

Such railroad terminal corporation may acquire, hold, and dispose of the capital stock or bonds of railroad companies or of other terminal companies, for the purpose alone of raising money for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and repair of such passenger and freight depots and stations, and other terminal facilities mentioned in §§ 65-14-101 and 65-14-102, and not for the purpose of speculating in stocks or bonds, or managing or controlling railroads.

Acts 1893, ch. 11, § 3; Shan., § 2436; mod. Code 1932, § 4065; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1403.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 4.

65-14-104. Keeping of hotel, restaurant, and newsstand.

At any place where such railroad terminal corporation may acquire and construct passenger stations, the corporation may keep on such premises a hotel or restaurant, or both, and also a newsstand.

Acts 1893, ch. 11, § 3; Shan., § 2433; mod. Code 1932, § 4062; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1404.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 17.

65-14-105. Leasing of terminal facilities to railroad companies.

The corporation may lease to any railroad company or railroad companies its freight or passenger depots or stations, and its other terminal facilities located at any place where the line or lines of the railroad company or companies may terminate, or through which they may pass, and such lease may be upon such terms and for such time as may be agreed upon by the parties.

Acts 1893, ch. 11, § 3; Shan., § 2434; mod. Code 1932, § 4063; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1405.

65-14-106. Lessee railroads — Guarantee of principal and interest of bonds and other contracts.

Such railroad company or companies may severally or jointly, or jointly and severally, guarantee the principal and interest of such bonds as may be issued by the railroad terminal corporation, and may in like manner guarantee the performance of any other contract that the railroad terminal corporation may make in regard to its corporate business.

Acts 1893, ch. 11, § 3; Shan., § 2435; mod. Code 1932, § 4064; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1406.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 4.

65-14-107. Lessee railroads — Authority to subscribe, hold, and dispose of stock or bonds of terminal corporations.

Any such railroad company or companies may also subscribe, hold, and dispose of the capital stock or bonds which may be issued by the railroad terminal corporation.

Acts 1893, ch. 11, § 3; Shan., § 2436; mod. Code 1932, § 4065; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1407.